Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 1. General Provisions.
§ 11-8.
Instruments executed by minors or surviving spouses to obtain benefits under certain federal legislation.

Any person under the age of 18 or surviving spouse who has not remarried who is eligible for a guaranty of credit under the provisions of Title III of an Act of Congress of the United States approved June 22, 1944, entitled the “Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944,” as now or hereafter amended, or other like federal law, shall be upon complying with the terms of this section, qualified to contract for and purchase any real or personal property with respect to which the guaranteed loan is to be made, to execute the note or other evidence of the loan indebtedness and to secure the debt by the execution of a deed of trust or chattel mortgage, or other instrument, upon the real or personal property acquired as aforesaid in connection with the proposed loan or theretofore acquired by such person, whether by purchase or otherwise, and such person shall, in all respects, be bound by such contracts or other instruments entered into as though he were of full age.

When any such person is under the age of 18 years, no contract, note, deed of trust, mortgage, or other instrument required to obtain benefits under such federal legislation shall be executed by such person unless the circuit or corporation court of the city or county, or judge thereof in vacation, in which the property is located or to be used, after a petition signed by any such person has been filed with it or him, approves the same. Such petition shall set forth the facts pertaining to the proposed transaction and shall state why the judge or court should approve and authorize the execution of the necessary instruments.

The petition shall be heard by the court without a jury, and its decision thereon shall be final. A guardian ad litem shall be appointed who shall make an investigation and report in writing whether in his opinion the best interest of the petitioner would be served by permitting the petitioner to enter into such transaction, and the report shall be filed with the papers in the case. No such petition shall be approved by the court unless such approval is recommended by the report of the guardian ad litem and unless it is also recommended by the testimony of at least two disinterested and qualified witnesses appointed by the court, or the judge thereof in vacation. The order of approval shall recite the recommendation of the guardian ad litem and the witnesses and also their names and addresses. And the judge of the court hearing the case shall fix a reasonable fee for the attorneys and guardians ad litem.

The court, if of opinion that entry into such transaction would benefit the petitioner, shall approve the prayer of the petition, and the petitioner, if he enters into such transaction and executes any instrument required therein, shall be bound thereby as if of full age whether all or part of the obligation secured is so guaranteed.

All rights that have accrued or obligations that have arisen under this section prior to January 30, 1947, are hereby declared valid and binding.

If the court approves the prayer of the petition, such approval shall operate to vest title and confer the power to encumber or convey title to real or personal property acquired pursuant to such approval.

Any infant spouse of an infant veteran permitted by the court to make loans under this section may unite in any conveyance to effectuate such a loan as if he were a spouse of an adult signing as provided under the provisions of former § 55-42, relating to the removal of disability of infancy in certain cases.

History.

1946, p. 432; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5760a; 1947, p. 102; 1954, c. 602; 1972, c. 825; 2020, c. 900.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “former § 55-42” for “§ 55-42.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900, in the first paragraph, substituted “surviving spouse” for “widow” and “he were” for “he or she were”; in the second paragraph, substituted “has been filed with it or him, approves” for “shall have been filed with it or him, approve”; in the fourth paragraph, substituted “enters” for “enter,” “executes” for “execute” and “is so guaranteed” for “be so guaranteed”; in the fifth paragraph, substituted “that” for “which” twice; in the sixth paragraph, substituted “approves” for “approve”; in the seventh paragraph, substituted “he were” for “he or she was” and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Husband and Wife, § 95.

§ 11-9.
Writing payable to deceased person.

A bond, note or other writing to a person or persons who, or some of whom, are dead at the time of its execution, shall be as valid as if such person or persons were then alive.

History.

Code 1919, § 5761.

Cross references.

As to proceedings on writing binding deceased person, see §

8.01-11

.

§§ 11-9.1 through 11-9.7.
Repealed by Acts 2010, cc. 455 and 632, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions, see the Uniform Power of Attorney Act, §

64.2-1600

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former §

11-9.1

, relating to when power of attorney, etc., not terminated by principal’s disability; exception, was derived from Acts 1954, c. 486; 1984, c. 101; 1995, c. 369; 1997, c. 921; 2004, c. 380; 2007, c. 520.

Former § 11-9.2, relating to powers of attorney not revoked, prior to their termination date, until actual notice of death or disability, was derived from Acts 1954, c. 486; 1984, c. 101; 1995, c. 369; 1997, c. 921; 2004, c. 380; 2007, c. 520.

Former § 11-9.3, relating to powers of attorney executed by members of armed services listed as missing in action, was derived from Acts 1968, c. 118.

Former § 11-9.4, relating to contingent powers of attorney, was derived from Acts 1987, c. 340.

Former § 11-9.5, relating to gifts under power of attorney, was derived from Acts 1992, c. 544.

Former § 11-9.6, relating to certain duties of attorneys-in-fact and agents empowered to act under §

11-9.1

, was derived from Acts 1995, c. 369; 1999, c. 76; 2007, cc. 385, 520.

Former § 11-9.7, relating to failure to deliver power of attorney, was derived from Acts 2003, c. 269.

§ 11-9.8.
Construction of certain terms of offer to contract; use of experience modification factor prohibited.

As used in this section:“Contract” means an agreement for the provision of construction services under which the contractor will be required to have and maintain a policy of insurance as defined in §

38.2-119

.“Experience modification factor” means a value assigned to an employer as determined by a rate service organization in accordance with its uniform experience rating plan required to be filed pursuant to subsection D of §

38.2-1913

.“Offer to contract” means a solicitation of bids, Request for Proposals, or similar invitation to enter into a contract that is extended to potential contractors for construction services.“Person” means any individual; firm; cooperative; association; corporation; limited liability company; trust; business trust; syndicate; partnership; limited liability partnership; joint venture; receiver; trustee in bankruptcy; club, society, or other group or combination acting as a unit; or public body, including but not limited to (i) the Commonwealth; (ii) any other state; and (iii) any agency, department, institution, political subdivision, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth or any other state.

A term of an offer to contract issued that requires that the successful bidder have a specified experience modification factor is prohibited.

Any contract or offer to contract that requires the contractor or bidder responding to the offer to contract to have a specified experience modification factor is prohibited.

History.

2016, c. 754.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 754, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any offer to contract, as defined in §

11-9.8

of the Code of Virginia, as created in this act; Invitation to Bid; or Request for Proposal for construction services issued on or after July 1, 2016.”